Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 1 General Provisions

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1984, p. 1105, § 1, effective July 1, 1985, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this article and enacted the current article. The effect of this repeal and reenactment was to amend the existing Code sections in this article (or restate them without change) and to enact certain new Code sections.

45-17-1.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Attesting” and “attestation” are synonymous and mean the notarial act of witnessing or attesting a signature or execution of a deed or other written instrument, where such notarial act does not involve the taking of an acknowledgment, the administering of an oath or affirmation, the taking of a verification, or the certification of a copy.

“Notarial act” means any act that a notary public is authorized by law to perform and includes, without limitation, attestation, the taking of an acknowledgment, the administration of an oath or affirmation, the taking of a verification upon an oath or affirmation, and the certification of a copy.

“Notarial certificate” means the notary’s documentation of a notarial act.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-17-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1446, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45.

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020, see Executive Order 03.31.20.01.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 and 2021 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 1446, § 1, effective April 11, 1986, in effect redesignated former §

45-17-1

as §

45-17-1

.1.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law of real property, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 319 (1986).

45-17-1.1.
Power to appoint notaries public.

The power to appoint notaries public is vested in the clerks of the superior courts and may be exercised by them at any time.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1446; Ga. L. 1868, p. 130, § 1; Code 1868, § 1503; Code 1873, § 1497; Code 1882, § 1497; Civil Code 1895, § 498; Civil Code 1910, § 616; Code 1933, § 71-101; Ga. L. 1947, p. 1108, § 1; Ga. L. 1949, p. 1940, § 1; Code 1981, §

45-17-1

; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1105, § 1; Code 1981, §

45-17-1

.1, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1446, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 1446, § 1, effective April 11, 1986, in effect redesignated, without change, former §

45-17-1

as this Code section.

45-17-2.
Qualifications of notaries.

Any individual applying for appointment to be a notary public shall:

Be at least 18 years old;

Be a United States citizen or be a legal resident of the United States;

Be a legal resident of the county from which such individual is appointed;

Have, and provide at the time of the application, the applicant’s operating telephone number; and

Be able to read and write the English language.

The qualification of paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply to any nonresident individual applying for appointment as a notary public under the provisions of Code Section 45-17-7.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1449; Code 1868, § 1506; Code 1873, § 1500; Code 1882, § 1500; Civil Code 1895, § 501; Civil Code 1910, § 619; Code 1933, § 71-102; Ga. L. 1947, p. 1108, § 1; Ga. L. 1949, p. 1940, § 2; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 330, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1105, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1469, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1446, § 2; Ga. L. 2007, p. 221, § 1/HB 274.

45-17-2.1.
Application to be a notary; endorsements and declarations.

Any individual desiring to be a notary public shall submit application to the clerk of superior court of the county in which the individual resides or, when applying under the provisions of Code Section 45-17-7, to the clerk of superior court of the county in which the individual works or has a business. Except for applicants applying under the provisions of Code Section 45-17-7, the applicant shall submit proof to the clerk of superior court that he or she resides in the county in which the applicant is applying. Such proof shall consist of one of the following:

A valid Georgia driver’s license;

A valid United States passport;

A valid voter identification card; or

Such other valid identification by a local or state government or by the United States government.

The applicant shall sign and swear or affirm as outlined in paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of this Code section to the truthfulness of the application which shall state:

That the applicant resides or works or has a business in the county of application and the address of the residence or business. The applicant shall use his or her residential address for purposes of the application and may only use a business address for the application if the applicant is applying pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 45-17-7;

That the applicant is at least 18 years old;

That the applicant can read and write the English language;

That the applicant has an operating telephone number;

All denials, revocations, suspensions, restrictions, or resignations of a notary commission held by the applicant; and

All criminal convictions of the applicant, including any plea of nolo contendere, except minor traffic violations.

In addition to the application required in subsection (a) of this Code section, every applicant for initial appointment as a notary public shall also submit the following endorsement and declaration to the clerk of superior court of the county in which the individual makes application:

Endorsements from two persons who are not relatives of the applicant, who are at least 18 years old, who reside in the county in which the individual makes application, and who have known the applicant for at least one month. The endorsement shall be in the following form:

Click to view

I, , being 18 years of age or older and a legal resident of , believe the applicant for a notary public commission, , who is not related to myself, to be a person of integrity, of good moral character, and capable of performing notarial acts. I have known the applicant for one month or more.
(name of endorser)
(name of county)
(name of applicant)
(Signature of endorser) (Date) (Address of endorser) (Telephone number of endorser) (2) A declaration of applicant which shall have been signed in the presence of a commissioned notary public of this state. The declaration of applicant shall be in the following form: I, , do solemnly swear or affirm under penalty of perjury that the personal information I have written in this application is true, complete, and correct.
(name of applicant)
(Signature of applicant) State of County of On this day of , , before me appeared, , the person who signed the preceding declaration of applicant in my presence and who swore or affirmed that understood the document and freely declared it to be truthful.
(he/she)
(Official signature of the notary) (Official seal of the notary)

History.

Code 1981, §

45-17-2.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1105, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1469, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 45; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1446, § 3; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 45; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 45; Ga. L. 2007, p. 221, § 2/HB 274.

45-17-2.2.
Application information to be matter of public record.

The information in the application for appointment and commissioning as a notary public shall be a matter of public record.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-17-2.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1105, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1469, § 4.

45-17-2.3.
Grant or denial of commission or recommission; grounds; unauthorized practice of law.

After an applicant submits to the clerk of superior court of the county the application, endorsements, and declaration of applicant as required in Code Section 45-17-2.1, the clerk of superior court shall either grant or deny a commission or recommission as a notary public within ten days following the applicant’s submission of the necessary documents.

The clerk of superior court may in his or her discretion deny a commission or recommission to an applicant based on any of the following grounds:

The applicant’s criminal history;

Revocation, suspension, or restriction of any notary commission or professional license issued to the applicant by this or any other state;

The commission in this or any state of any act enumerated in subsection (a) of Code Section 45-17-15, whether or not criminal penalties or commission suspension or revocation resulted; or

The applicant is found by the State Bar of Georgia, a court of this state, or a court of any other state to have engaged in the unauthorized practice of law.

Any applicant who is denied a notarial commission or recommission by the clerk of superior court shall upon demand be allowed a hearing and adjudication before the superior court clerk with a right of de novo appeal to the superior court, such appeal to be determined by the court without the intervention of a jury.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-17-2.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1105, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 45; Ga. L. 2002, p. 630, § 1.

Cross references.

Unauthorized practice of law forbidden, §

15-19-51

.

45-17-3.
Oath of office.

Before entering on the duties of his office, each notary public shall take and subscribe before the clerk of the superior court the following oath, which shall be entered on his minutes:

“I,
_______________ , do solemnly swear or affirm that I will well and truly perform the duties of a notary public to the best of my ability; and I further swear or affirm that I am not the holder of any public money belonging to the state and unaccounted for, so help me God.”

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1447; Ga. L. 1868, p. 130, § 2; Code 1868, § 1504; Code 1873, § 1498; Code 1882, § 1498; Civil Code 1895, § 499; Civil Code 1910, § 617; Code 1933, § 71-103; Ga. L. 1947, p. 1108, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1105, § 1.

45-17-4.
Fees; Secretary of State to keep record of notaries appointed; reappointment.

Before a certificate shall be issued to a notary public, he or she shall pay to the clerk of the superior court the sum prescribed by Code Section 15-6-77, relating to fees of clerks of the superior courts, from which amount the clerk shall be entitled to cover his or her services in issuing the certificate of appointment as notary public, administering the oath, and recording the same. The amount by which the sum prescribed by Code Section 15-6-77 exceeds the amount which the clerk is required by this Code section to forward to the Georgia Superior Court Clerks’ Cooperative Authority is what the clerk shall use to cover his or her services. The clerk shall immediately send a copy of the certificate of appointment, under his or her seal of office, and $2.00 to the Georgia Superior Court Clerks’ Cooperative Authority which shall keep a record showing the names of the notaries public appointed with their addresses, signatures, ages, sex, and the terms for which their commissions run; and such amount shall cover the cost of the Georgia Superior Court Clerks’ Cooperative Authority in keeping such records. On reappointment as notaries public, the sum prescribed by Code Section 15-6-77 shall be paid to the clerk of the superior court and disbursed in the same manner as the fee for the original appointment is disbursed under this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 80, § 1; Code 1882, § 1503a; Civil Code 1895, § 507; Civil Code 1910, § 625; Code 1933, § 71-105; Ga. L. 1947, p. 1108, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 497, § 6; Ga. L. 1971, p. 699, § 4; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1105, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 673, § 1.

45-17-5.
Term of office; revocation; renewal of commission; issuance of certificates of appointment; record of appointments; misrepresentation as notary.

Each notary public shall hold office for four years, subject to revocation at any time by the clerk of the superior court, at the end of which time, on petition, his commission may be renewed by order of the clerk for a like term. Renewal of a notary public commission may be done in person or by mail at the discretion of the clerk of superior court. The clerk of the superior court shall issue to each notary public a certificate of his appointment and qualifications, which certificate shall contain the name, address, age, and sex of the appointee, the date the certificate was issued, and the term for which the appointment runs. The clerk shall also keep a record of the names, addresses, signatures, ages, sex, and the terms of all notaries public whom he appoints.

At the time the clerk of the superior court issues a certificate of appointment as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, said officer shall also issue to the appointee a duplicate original of such certificate. The presentation of such duplicate original, either by mail or in person, to the supplier of a notary public seal shall be necessary to authorize such supplier to make up a notary public seal and deliver it to the appointee.

It shall be unlawful for any person to hold himself or herself out as a notary public or to exercise the powers of a notary public unless such person has an unexpired commission as a notary public.

History.

Laws 1824, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 210; Code 1863, § 1448; Ga. L. 1868, p. 130, § 2; Code 1868, § 1505; Code 1873, § 1499; Code 1882, § 1499; Civil Code 1895, § 500; Civil Code 1910, § 618; Code 1933, § 71-104; Ga. L. 1947, p. 1108, § 1; Ga. L. 1949, p. 1940, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1106, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 34; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1105, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1982, p. 1106, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provided as follows: “This Act shall not invalidate any notary public seal lawfully issued and possessed prior to the effective date of this Act [November 1, 1982].”

45-17-6.
Seal of office.

For the authentication of his notarial acts each notary public must provide a seal of office, which seal shall have for its impression his name, the words “Notary Public,” the name of the state, and the county of his residence; or it shall have for its impression his name and the words “Notary Public, Georgia, State at Large.” Notaries commissioned or renewing their commission after July 1, 1985, shall provide a seal of office which shall have for its impression the notary’s name, the words “Notary Public,” the name of the state, and the county of his appointment. The embossment of notarial certificates by the notary’s seal shall be authorized but not necessary, and the use of a rubber or other type stamp shall be sufficient for imprinting the notary’s seal. A scrawl shall not be a sufficient notary seal. An official notarial act must be documented by the notary’s seal.

No document executed prior to July 1, 1986, which would otherwise be eligible for recording in the real property records maintained by any clerk of superior court or constitute record notice or actual notice of any matter to any person shall be ineligible for recording or fail to constitute such notice because of noncompliance with the requirement that the document contain a notary seal.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to supply a notary public seal to any person unless the person has presented the duplicate original of the certificate commissioning the person as a notary public. It shall be unlawful for any person to order or obtain a notary public seal unless such person is commissioned as a notary public.

History.

Ga. L. 1863-64, p. 58, § 3; Code 1863, § 1452; Code 1868, § 1509; Code 1873, § 1503; Code 1882, § 1503; Civil Code 1895, § 505; Civil Code 1910, § 623; Code 1933, § 71-107; Ga. L. 1947, p. 1108, § 1; Ga. L. 1949, p. 1940, § 3; Ga. L. 1952, p. 456, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1106, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1105, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1469, § 5; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1446, § 4.

Cross references.

Requirement of seal for notary’s attestation of deeds executed outside state, §

44-2-21

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 456, § 2, provides that all deeds executed after the passage of the Act approved February 25, 1949 (Ga. L. 1949, p. 940) are declared to be valid, if executed as otherwise required by law even though the same do not have the seal of the notary thereon.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 1446, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, provided: “This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor [approved April 11, 1986] or upon its becoming law without such approval. It is expressly declared that the curative provisions of paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 45-17-6 and of subsection (c) of Code Section 45-17-8.1, as enacted by this Act, are intended to have retroactive application except to the extent that such retroactive application would unconstitutionally impair any vested right.”

Law reviews.

For article surveying real property law in 1984-1985, see 37 Mercer L. Rev. 343 (1985).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 273 (2015).

45-17-7.
Commissioning of nonresidents as notaries; powers and duties.

Any person who is a resident of a state bordering on the State of Georgia and who carries on a business or profession in the State of Georgia or who is regularly employed in the State of Georgia may be commissioned as a notary public by the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the person carries on said profession, business, or employment.

Such person wishing to be commissioned as a notary public must meet all the requirements of Code Section 45-17-2, as it applies to this Code section.

Such person shall submit the application, endorsements, and declaration of applicant as required by Code Section 45-17-2.1 to the clerk of superior court in the county in which such person carries on such profession, business, or employment. The clerk of superior court shall approve or deny such application based on the provisions of Code Section 45-17-2.3. Upon approval and payment of the usual fees to the clerk, the applicant shall be issued a certificate as a notary public of this state and shall be authorized to perform all of the duties and exercise all of the powers and authorities relating to notaries public who are residents of this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 1051, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1105, § 1.

45-17-8.
Powers and duties generally.

Notaries public shall have authority to:

Witness or attest signature or execution of deeds and other written instruments;

Take acknowledgments;

Administer oaths and affirmations in all matters incidental to their duties as commercial officers and all other oaths and affirmations which are not by law required to be administered by a particular officer;

Witness affidavits upon oath or affirmation;

Take verifications upon oath or affirmation;

Make certified copies, provided that the document presented for copying is an original document and is neither a public record nor a publicly recorded document certified copies of which are available from an official source other than a notary and provided that the document was photocopied under supervision of the notary; and

Perform such other acts as they are authorized to perform by other laws of this state.

No notary shall be obligated to perform a notarial act if he feels such act is:

For a transaction which the notary knows or suspects is illegal, false, or deceptive;

For a person who is being coerced;

For a person whose demeanor causes compelling doubts about whether the person knows the consequences of the transaction requiring the notarial act; or

In situations which impugn and compromise the notary’s impartiality, as specified in subsection (c) of this Code section.

A notary shall be disqualified from performing a notarial act in the following situations which impugn and compromise the notary’s impartiality:

When the notary is a signer of the document which is to be notarized; or

When the notary is a party to the document or transaction for which the notarial act is required.

A notary public shall not execute a notarial certificate containing a statement known by the notary to be false nor perform any action with an intent to deceive or defraud.

In performing any notarial act, a notary public shall confirm the identity of the document signer, oath taker, or affirmant based on personal knowledge or on satisfactory evidence. Such satisfactory evidence shall include, but not be limited to, a valid Veterans Health Identification Card issued by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.

The signature of a notary public documenting a notarial act shall not be evidence to show that such notary public had knowledge of the contents of the document so signed, other than those specific contents which constitute the signature, execution, acknowledgment, oath, affirmation, affidavit, verification, or other act which the signature of that notary public documents, nor is a certification by a notary public that a document is a certified or true copy of an original document evidence to show that such notary public had knowledge of the contents of the document so certified.

History.

Ga. L. 1863-64, p. 58, § 2; Code 1863, § 1451; Code 1868, § 1508; Code 1873, § 1502; Code 1882, § 1502; Civil Code 1895, § 503; Civil Code 1910, § 621; Code 1933, § 71-108; Ga. L. 1947, p. 1108, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1105, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1446, §§ 5, 6; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1113, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 97, § 1/SB 96.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added the second sentence in subsection (e).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, “acknowledgments” was substituted for “acknowledgements” in paragraph (a)(2).

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020, see Executive Order 04.09.20.01.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 and 2021 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

45-17-8.1.
Signature and date of notarial act.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, in documenting a notarial act, a notary public shall sign on the notarial certification, by hand in ink, only and exactly the name indicated on the notary’s commission and shall record on the notarial certification the exact date of the notarial act.

The requirement of subsection (a) of this Code section for recording of the date of the notarial act shall not apply to an attestation of deeds or any other instruments pertaining to real property.

No document executed prior to July 1, 1986, which would otherwise be eligible for recording in the real property records maintained by any clerk of superior court or constitute record notice or actual notice of any matter to any person shall be ineligible for recording or fail to constitute such notice because of noncompliance with the present or any prior requirements of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-17-8.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1105, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1469, § 6; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1446, § 7.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 1446, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, provided: “This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor [approved April 11, 1986] or upon its becoming law without such approval. It is expressly declared that the curative provisions of paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 45-17-6 and of subsection (c) of Code Section 45-17-8.1, as enacted by this Act, are intended to have retroactive application except to the extent that such retroactive application would unconstitutionally impair any vested right.”

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law of real property, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 319 (1986).

45-17-8.2.
Misrepresentation prohibited; required notice; posting of schedule of fees; penalties.

A notary shall not make claims to have or imply he or she has powers, qualifications, rights, or privileges that the office of notary does not authorize, including the powers to counsel on immigration matters and to give legal advice.

A notary who is not an attorney licensed to practice law in this state who advertises the person’s services as a notary public in English or any other language, by radio, television, signs, pamphlets, newspapers, other written communication, or in any other manner, shall post or otherwise include with the advertisement the notice set forth in this subsection in English and in every other language used for the advertisement. The notice shall be of a conspicuous size, if in writing, and shall state: “I AM NOT AN ATTORNEY LICENSED TO PRACTICE LAW IN THE STATE OF GEORGIA, AND I MAY NOT GIVE LEGAL ADVICE OR ACCEPT FEES FOR LEGAL ADVICE.” If the advertisement is made by radio or television, the statement may be modified but must include substantially the same message.

A notary who is not an attorney licensed to practice law in this state is prohibited from representing or advertising that the notary is a “legal consultant” or an expert on legal matters.

A notary who is not an attorney licensed to practice law in this state is prohibited from rendering any service that constitutes the unauthorized practice of law.

A notary required to comply with the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section shall prominently post at the notary public’s place of business a schedule of fees established by law which a notary may charge. The fee schedule shall be written in English and in any non-English language in which the notary services were solicited and shall contain the notice required in subsection (b) of this Code section, unless the notice is otherwise prominently posted at the notary public’s place of business.

The Attorney General or prosecuting attorney may seek injunctive relief against any notary public who violates the provisions of this Code section. Nothing in this Code section diminishes the authority of the State Bar of Georgia.

A violation of subsection (c) or (d) of this Code section constitutes a deceptive trade practice under Code Section 10-1-427 in addition to any other penalties provided by law.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-17-8.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1105, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 630, § 2.

Cross references.

Unauthorized practice of law forbidden, §

15-19-51

.

45-17-9.
Where notarial acts may be exercised.

Notarial acts may be exercised in any county in the state.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1450; Code 1868, § 1507; Code 1873, § 1501; Code 1882, § 1501; Civil Code 1895, § 502; Civil Code 1910, § 620; Code 1933, § 71-106; Ga. L. 1947, p. 1108, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1105, § 1.

45-17-10.
Notary’s authority in relation to attachment, garnishment, or dispossessory action.

It shall not be lawful for notaries public to issue attachments or garnishments, to approve bonds for the purpose of issuing attachments or garnishments, or to issue a summons in a dispossessory case; but a notary may attest an affidavit in an attachment, garnishment, or dispossessory action; provided, however, no writ or summons in said matter shall issue without first having judicial approval as provided by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1893, p. 117, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 504; Civil Code 1910, § 622; Code 1933, § 71-109; Ga. L. 1947, p. 1108, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1105, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1446, § 8.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, a comma was inserted following “to issue attachments or garnishments”.

45-17-11.
Fees of notaries.

The fees of notaries public shall be as follows:

Administering an oath in any case $ 2.00 (2) Each attendance on any person to make proof as a notary public and certifying to same 2.00 (3) Every other certificate 2.00

Click to view

It shall not be lawful for any notary public to charge a greater sum than $4.00 for each service performed. Said sum shall include a fee of $2.00 for performing the notarial act and a fee of $2.00 for an attendance to make proof as a notary public and certifying to same if such certification, which shall be issued by the clerk of superior court of the county in which the notary public was appointed or the Georgia Superior Court Clerks’ Cooperative Authority, is required. Registering shall be paid for by the party who has the service performed. The fee for all official acts which the notary may perform shall be the same as those prescribed for other officers who are likewise permitted to perform them.

A notary public need not charge fees for notarial acts.

A notary public shall inform the person requesting any notarial act, prior to performing the act, the fees permitted for each act.

History.

Laws 1792, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 352; Code 1863, § 3628; Code 1868, § 3653; Code 1873, § 3704; Code 1882, § 3704; Civil Code 1895, § 506; Ga. L. 1898, p. 106, § 1; Ga. L. 1904, p. 97, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 624; Code 1933, § 71-110; Ga. L. 1947, p. 1108, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1105, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 673, § 3.

45-17-12.
Authority of notaries who are stockholders, directors, officers, or employees of banks or other corporations to witness execution of written instruments.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Bank” or “other corporation” means a bank or other corporation organized under the laws of this or any other state or the United States.

“Written instrument,” without limiting the generality of meaning of such words, means deeds, mortgages, bills of sale to secure debt, deeds to secure debt, deeds of trust, contracts, legal pleadings, affidavits, certificates, or any other like instruments.

It shall be lawful for any notary public who is a stockholder, director, officer, or employee of a bank or other corporation to take the acknowledgment of any party to any written instrument executed to or by such corporation. Any such notary public may act and sign as official witness to the execution by any party of any written instrument executed to or by such bank or other corporation. Any such notary public may administer an oath to any other stockholder, director, officer, employee, or agent of such bank or other corporation or may protest for nonacceptance or nonpayment bills of exchange, drafts, checks, notes, and other negotiable instruments which may be owned or held for collection by such bank or other corporation, provided that it shall be unlawful for any notary public to act and sign as official witness to or take the acknowledgment of an instrument executed by or to a bank or other corporation of which he is a stockholder, director, officer, or employee where such notary would be witnessing or acknowledging his own signature as it appears on the instrument either in his capacity as an individual or in his representative capacity with the bank or other corporation or to protest any negotiable instrument owned or held for collection by such bank or other corporation where such notary is individually a party to such instrument.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 313, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1962, p. 104, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1105, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 45.

45-17-13.
Change of residence, address, or name.

Every notary public shall notify in writing the appointing clerk of superior court and provide a copy of such notice to the Georgia Superior Court Clerks’ Cooperative Authority of any change in the notary’s residence or business address, whichever was used for the purpose of appointment, and of any change in the notary’s telephone number. The notice shall contain both the old and new addresses and must be received by the clerk of superior court within 30 days of the change.

Every notary public shall notify in writing the appointing clerk of superior court, with a copy to the Georgia Superior Court Clerks’ Cooperative Authority, of any change in the notary’s name. The notice shall contain both the old and new names, the new signature, and any new address and must be received by the clerk of superior court within 30 days of the change.

A notary with a new name may begin to officially sign the new name on notarial certificates when the following steps have been completed:

The notice described in paragraph (1) of this subsection has been received by the appointing clerk of superior court;

A confirmation of the notary’s name change has been received from the appointing clerk of superior court; and

A new seal bearing the new name exactly as indicated in the confirmation has been obtained.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-17-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1105, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 673, § 3; Ga. L. 2007, p. 221, § 3/HB 274; Ga. L. 2008, p. 324, § 45/SB 455.

45-17-14.
Notice of loss or theft of notarial seal.

Within ten days of the loss or theft of an official notarial seal, the notary public shall send to the appointing clerk of superior court, with a copy to the Georgia Superior Court Clerks’ Cooperative Authority, a written notice of the loss or theft.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-17-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1105, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 673, § 3.

45-17-15.
Revocation of commission; denial of reappointment.

The appointing clerk of superior court may by letter, with a copy to the Georgia Superior Court Clerks’ Cooperative Authority, revoke the commission or deny the reappointment of any notary public who:

Violates any provision of this chapter;

Performs any notarial act in violation of Code Section 45-17-8;

Is found to have submitted an application or endorsement for a notarial commission containing substantial and significant misstatement or omission of fact;

Ceases to reside or work or have a business in this state; or

Becomes incapable of reading and writing the English language.

Any notary public whose commission has been revoked shall upon demand be allowed a hearing and adjudication before the superior court clerk with a right of de novo appeal to the superior court, such appeal to be determined by the court without the intervention of a jury.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-17-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1105, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 673, § 3.

45-17-16.
Revocation of commission; return of papers; destruction of seal.

Within ten days after receiving notice from the appointing clerk of superior court that a notarial commission has been revoked, an individual shall send or deliver to the appointing clerk of superior court all papers of appointment. Such individual shall also destroy the official notarial seal.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-17-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1105, § 1.

45-17-17.
Resignation of commission; return of papers; destruction of seal.

A person who wishes to resign a notarial commission shall send a signed letter of resignation to the appointing clerk of superior court, with a copy to the Georgia Superior Court Clerks’ Cooperative Authority, and all papers of appointment. The resigning notary public shall destroy the official notarial seal.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-17-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1105, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 673, § 3.

45-17-18.
Destruction of seal upon expiration or denial of renewal of commission.

A notary public whose commission expires and who does not apply for renewal of such commission or whose application for renewal of a commission is denied shall destroy the official notary seal.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-17-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1105, § 1.

45-17-19.
Authenticity of official signature and term of office; fees; apostille.

The authenticity of the official signature and term of office of a notary public may be evidenced by:

A certificate of authority from the appointing clerk of superior court or the Georgia Superior Court Clerks’ Cooperative Authority; or

An apostille in the exact form prescribed by the Hague Convention from the Secretary of State, provided that an apostille shall be obtained only from the Georgia Superior Court Clerks’ Cooperative Authority on or after the thirtieth day following the designation, by the United States Department of State, of the Georgia Superior Court Clerks’ Cooperative Authority as an authority in the United States competent to issue an apostille.

The fee for a certificate of authority shall be $2.00. The fee for an apostille shall be $3.00.

An apostille as specified by the Hague Convention Abolishing the Requirement of Legalization for Foreign Public Documents shall be attached to any document requiring authentication that is bound for a nation that has signed and ratified the Hague Convention.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-17-19

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1105, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 673, § 2.

45-17-20.
Penalty; prosecution of violations of article.

Any person who violates subsection (d) of Code Section 45-17-8 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any person who performs any notarial service without complying with the provisions of this article shall, upon the first or second conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon a third or subsequent conviction be guilty of a felony, punishable by imprisonment of not less than one year nor more than five years, a fine of up to $5,000.00, or both.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-17-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1105, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 45; Ga. L. 2007, p. 221, § 4/HB 274.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2007, “of” was substituted for “or” following “guilty” in subsection (b).